Oklahoma, session 2026, SB778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 905 of Title 40, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall develop workforce


and industry training for the use of teachers and administrators


across the state no later than August 1, 2026, and each year


thereafter. The purpose of the training shall be to improve the


knowledge of teachers and administrators on the conditions of


Oklahoma’s workforce and to ensure that the students of the state


are fully prepared to access career pathways upon graduation.



Req. No. 807 Page 1


1. The training shall include instruction over the key


industries of Oklahoma as determined by the Oklahoma Workforce


Commission, as well as workforce shortages in those industries. The


training shall be updated annually to reflect changes in Oklahoma’s


key industries and the workforce demand of those industries no later


than August 1, 2027.


2. The training shall be no more than one (1) hour in duration


and shall be accessible in an online video format compatible with


the State Department of Education online professional learning


platform.


B. All teachers pursuant to Section 1-116 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes or any subsequent statute shall be required to


watch the training on an annual basis, starting no later than May 1,


2027.


C. The State Department of Education shall be responsible for


annually posting the training on its online professional learning


platform no later than October 30, 2026, and each year thereafter.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-807 MR 1/19/2025 5:43:08 AM

Req. No. 807 Page 2